Utah statutes.
76-9-102.   Disorderly conduct.
(1) A person is guilty of disorderly conduct if:
(a) he refuses to comply with the lawful order of the police to move from a
public place, or knowingly creates a hazardous or physically offensive
condition, by any act which serves no legitimate purpose; or
(b) intending to cause public inconvenience, annoyance, or alarm, or
recklessly creating a risk thereof, he:
(i) engages in fighting or in violent, tumultuous, or threatening behavior;
(ii) makes unreasonable noises in a public place;
(iii) makes unreasonable noises in a private place which can be heard in a
public place; or
(iv)  obstructs vehicular or pedestrian traffic.
(2)  "Public place," for the purpose of this section, means any place to which
the public or a substantial group of the public has access and includes but is
not limited to streets, highways, and the common areas of schools, hospitals,
apartment houses, office buildings, transport facilities, and shops.
(3)  Disorderly conduct is a class C misdemeanor if the offense continues
after a request by a person to desist. Otherwise it is an infraction.
